Wyoming, session 2025, SF0031.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 19-14-107(c) by creating a new
paragraph (xiii), 21-17-207 and 21-18-201(c) are amended to
read:

19-14-107. Creation of veterans' commission;
composition; terms.
SF0031

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0255

(c) The commission shall:

(xiii) Recommend members of the public
representing veterans and veteran services to be appointed
by the governor to the university board of trustees and the
Wyoming community college commission to serve as ex officio
nonvoting members.

21-17-207. University board composition; ex officio
members.

(a) In addition to the members of the university
board of trustees specified under W.S. 21-17-201, the
director of the Wyoming community college commission
following members shall serve as a member members ex
officio, having the right to speak but not to vote:.

(i) The director of the Wyoming community
college commission;

SF0031

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0255
(ii) A member of the public representing
veterans and veteran services recommended by the Wyoming
veterans' commission and appointed by the governor.

21-18-201. Community college commission; created;
composition; removal.

(c) The governor, and the state superintendent of
public instruction and a member of the public representing
veterans and veteran services recommended by the Wyoming
veterans' commission and appointed by the governor are ex
officio nonvoting members of the commission.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0031